Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.140

Voter registration deadlines.

(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:

(a) Submit a registration application that is received by an election official no later than eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), "received" means: (i) Being physically received by an election official by the close of business of the required deadline; or (ii) for applications received online or electronically, by midnight, of the required deadline; or

(b) Register in person at a county auditor's office, the division of elections if in a separate location from the county auditor's office, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or other location designated by the county auditor no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election if the county is conducting an election, or general election.

(2)(a) In order to change a residence address for voting in any primary, special election, or general election, a person who is already registered to vote in Washington may update his or her registration by:

(i) Submitting an address change using a registration application or making notification via any non-in-person method that is received by election officials no later than eight days before the day of the primary, special election, or general election; or

(ii) Appearing in person, at a county auditor's office, the division of elections if in a separate location from the county auditor's office, a voting center, or other location designated by the county auditor, no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election if the county is conducting an election, or general election to be in effect for that primary, special election if the county is conducting an election, or general election.

(b) A registered voter who fails to update his or her residential address by this deadline may vote according to his or her previous registration address.

(3) To register or update a voting address in person at a county auditor's office, a voting center, or other location designated by the county auditor, a person must appear in person at a county auditor's office, a voting center, or other location designated by the county auditor at a time when the facility is open and complete the voter registration application by providing the information required by RCW 29A.08.010.

[ 2022 c 69 s 2; 2020 c 208 s 22; 2019 c 391 s 4; 2018 c 112 s 1; 2011 c 10 s 15; 2009 c 369 s 15; 2006 c 97 s 1; 2004 c 267 s 112; 2003 c 111 s 212. Prior: 1993 c 383 s 2; 1980 c 3 s 4; 1974 ex.s. c 127 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 20; 1965 c 9 s 29.07.160; prior: 1947 c 68 s 2; 1933 c 1 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5114-9. Formerly RCW 29.07.160.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Effective date—2018 c 112 ss 1-4: "Sections 1 through 4 of this act take effect June 30, 2019." [ 2018 c 112 s 6.]

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.